Utah statutes.
57-9-2.   Rights and interests to which marketable record title is subject.

The marketable record title is subject to:

(1)  all interests and defects which are inherent in the muniments of which such chain of record title is formed, except that a general reference in the muniments or any of them, to easements, use restrictions, or other interests created prior to the root of title is not sufficient to preserve them, unless specific identification is made therein of a recorded title transaction which creates  the easement, use restriction, or other interest;

(2)  all interests preserved by the filing of proper notice or by possession by the same owner continuously for a period of 40 years or more, in accordance with Section 57-9-4;

(3)  the rights of any person arising from prescriptive use or a period of adverse possession or user, which was in whole or in part subsequent to the effective date of the root of title;

(4)  any interest arising out of a title transaction which has been recorded subsequent to the effective date of the root of title from which the unbroken chain of title of record is started, except that the recording does not revive or give validity to any interest which has been extinguished prior to the time of the recording by the operation of Section 57-9-3; and

(5)  the exceptions stated in Section 57-9-6 as to rights of reversioners in leases, as to apparent easements and interests in the nature of easements, as to the right, title, or interests of the state in school or institutional trust lands or sovereign lands, and as to interests of the United States.



Amended by Chapter 241, 1999 General Session

